Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-10,105
Unfair trade practices; applicability.

Every society authorized to do business in this state shall be subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, except that nothing in the act shall be construed as applying to or affecting the right of any society to determine its eligibility requirements for membership or be construed as applying to or affecting the offering of benefits exclusively to members or persons eligible for membership in the society by a subsidiary corporation or affiliated organization of the society.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 34;

Laws 1986, LB 730, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 2.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.